District of Columbia statutes.
34-1260.01

Consumer protection.

(a)

A cable operator shall comply with all federal and District customer service regulations and with all customer service standards contained in the franchise agreement.

(b)

A cable operator shall maintain at least one office within the District, which shall be open and accessible to the public during normal business hours and limited evening and weekend hours, including facilities for 24-hour telephone subscriber assistance.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 1001
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334

History